Hawaii statutes.
§134-9 Licenses to carry. (a) In an
exceptional case, when an applicant shows reason to fear injury to the
applicant's person or property, the chief of police of the appropriate county
may grant a license to an applicant who is a citizen of the United States of
the age of twenty-one years or more or to a duly accredited official
representative of a foreign nation of the age of twenty-one years or more to
carry a pistol or revolver and ammunition therefor concealed on the person
within the county where the license is granted. Where the urgency or the need
has been sufficiently indicated, the respective chief of police may grant to an
applicant of good moral character who is a citizen of the United States of the
age of twenty-one years or more, is engaged in the protection of life and
property, and is not prohibited under section 134-7 from the ownership or
possession of a firearm, a license to carry a pistol or revolver and ammunition
therefor unconcealed on the person within the county where the license is
granted. The chief of police of the appropriate county, or the chief's
designated representative, shall perform an inquiry on an applicant by using
the National Instant Criminal Background Check System, to include a check of
the Immigration and Customs Enforcement databases where the applicant is not a
citizen of the United States, before any determination to grant a license is
made. Unless renewed, the license shall expire one year from the date of
issue.

(b) The chief of police of each county shall
adopt procedures to require that any person granted a license to carry a
concealed weapon on the person shall:

(1) Be qualified to use the firearm in a safe manner;

(2) Appear to be a suitable person to be so licensed;

(3) Not be prohibited under section 134-7 from the
ownership or possession of a firearm; and

(4) Not have been adjudged insane or not appear to be
mentally deranged.

(c) No person shall carry concealed or
unconcealed on the person a pistol or revolver without being licensed to do so
under this section or in compliance with sections 134-5(c) or 134-25.

(d) A fee of $10 shall be charged for each
license and shall be deposited in the treasury of the county in which the
license is granted. [L 1988, c 275, pt of §2; am L 1994, c 204, §8; am L 1997,
c 254, §§2, 4; am L 2000, c 96, §1; am L 2002, c 79, §1; am L 2006, c 27, §3
and c 66, §3; am L 2007, c 9, §8]

Case Notes

Where plaintiff asserted that §§134-6 and 134-9 violated
rights guaranteed by Article I and the Second, Fifth, Ninth, and Fourteenth
Amendments of the U.S. Constitution, defendants' motions to dismiss plaintiff's
complaint granted; among other things, plaintiff did not have standing to
challenge this chapter on the basis of an alleged deprivation of Second
Amendment or Ninth Amendment rights, this chapter is not an impermissible bill
of attainder with respect to plaintiff, and this chapter imposes no impairment
of a contractual right possessed by plaintiff. 548 F. Supp. 2d 1151.

Discussed: 911 F. Supp. 2d 972 (2012).

Mentioned: 74 H. 197, 840 P.2d 374.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next